Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1254
Prohibited operation; reckless or negligent; proof.

No person shall operate any motorboat or vessel or manipulate any water skis, surfboard, or similar device in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 54;

Laws 1989, LB 195, § 2.